Utah statutes.
63A-14-302.   Authority to review complaint -- Grounds for complaint -- Limitations on filings.

(1)  Subject to the requirements of this chapter, the commission may review an ethics complaint against an executive branch elected official if the complaint alleges that the executive branch elected official has committed a violation.

(2)  Individuals who file a complaint for an alleged violation shall file the complaint within two years after the later of:

(a)  the day on which the action or omission that forms the basis for the alleged violation occurs or would have been discovered by a reasonable person; or

(b)  the day on which a plea or conviction that forms the basis for the allegation is entered.

(3) (a)  A complaint may not contain an allegation that was previously reviewed by the commission, unless:

(i)  the allegation is accompanied by material facts or circumstances supporting the allegation that were not raised or pled to the commission when the allegation was previously reviewed; and

(ii)  the allegation and the general facts and circumstances supporting the allegation were only reviewed by the commission on one previous occasion.

(b)  If an allegation in a complaint does not comply with the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the commission or the chair shall dismiss the allegation with prejudice.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

